Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [624.7139] STOLEN FIREARMS; REQUIRED REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Duty to report. new text end new text begin A person who steals a firearm shall report the theft to a law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the theft occurred as soon as practicable but not later than within 48 hours of the theft. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates this section is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates this section a second time is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates this section a third or subsequent time is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report to commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin A chief of police or sheriff shall report a stolen firearm to the commissioner of public safety within seven days of receiving notification of the theft under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to acts committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a reporting system overseen by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to allow chiefs of police and sheriffs to report stolen firearms as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 624.7139. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end